Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:(1) A health carrier acting as a third-party administrator for a self-funded plan offered to employees or school employees under this chapter may not require a hospital system owned or operated by the state of Washington to participate in any commercial health plan or product offered or administered by the health carrier as a condition for negotiations or participation in the self-funded plan.(2) For purposes of this section, "health carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.--- END ---